Vermont statutes. Title 4 Judiciary
Chapter 19. Stenographic Reporters

§§ 791-793.
Repealed.
1979, No. 181 (Adj. Sess.), § 22.

§ 794.
Oath; correctness of reports and copies.

Upon appointment, a stenographic reporter shall be sworn before entering upon his or her duties, and shall be responsible for the correctness of his or her reports and certified copies thereof made by him or her or under his or her direction.

HISTORY:

Amended

1979, No. 181

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 795.
Filing of copies of transcripts.

When directed by the presiding judge of a Superior Court so to do and within the time prescribed by such judge, such stenographic reporter shall file with the clerk thereof certified copies of the evidence and proceedings in a cause heard by it.
Such copies shall be verbatim transcripts of the evidence and proceedings and be a part of the files of such court.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 796.
Transcripts for quasi-judicial proceedings.

A stenographic reporter shall furnish a verbatim and certified transcript of the evidence and proceedings in every hearing before a commission, department, or other quasi-judicial proceeding reported by him or her to the presiding officer within 20 days after the termination of such hearing.

HISTORY:

Amended

1979, No. 181

(Adj. Sess.), § 14.

§ 797.
Repealed.
1987, No. 120, § 2.

§ 798.
Probative force of transcripts.

All transcripts of evidence or proceedings in a cause or hearing tried in Superior Court or before an auditor, referee, or commissioner, ordered to be reported by a Probate or Superior judge, and made by or under the direction of the reporter and duly certified by him or her to be a verbatim transcript of the verbatim stenographic notes of such evidence or proceedings, shall be received as evidence in any action, civil or criminal, if relevant to the action.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 194

, § 10, operative Feb. 1, 1967;

1979, No. 181

(Adj. Sess.), § 16;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 44;

2021, No. 105

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 799.
Probate Division reporters.

Upon request of a Probate judge, the Superior Court clerk shall appoint and assign a staff member to make a verbatim report of the proceeding in the Probate Division.

HISTORY:

Amended

1979, No. 181

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 44a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 800.
Repealed.
1969, No. 125, § 16.

§ 801.
Hearings before commissions and quasi-judicial tribunals.

In hearings before a commission, department, or other quasi-judicial proceedings, such tribunal shall hire stenographic reporters for the purpose of making verbatim reports of the proceedings when one of the parties so requests in writing.

HISTORY:

1959, No. 192

, § 1, eff. May 20, 1959.

§ 802.
Approval of accounts.

The presiding officer of a State department, commission, board, or other agency shall approve the accounts of the stenographer or reporter in the proceeding referred to in sections 797 and 801 of this title and shall forward the same to the Commissioner of Finance and Management for payment.

HISTORY:

1959, No. 192

, § 3, eff. May 20, 1959; amended

1983, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 5(b).

§ 803.
Electronic recording equipment.

Subject to any rules prescribed by the Supreme Court pursuant to law, electronic sound or sound and video recording equipment may be used for the recording of any Superior Court or judicial bureau proceeding; testimony, objections, rulings, exceptions, arraignments, pleas, sentences, statements, and remarks made by any attorney or judge; oral instructions given by the judge; and any other judicial proceedings to the same extent as any recording by a stenographer or reporter permitted or required under existing statutes.

For the purpose of operating recording equipment, the judge may appoint or designate the official reporter of that court, a special reporter, the clerk of the court, any staff of the court, the court officer, or any other designated court personnel. The person operating recording equipment shall subscribe to an oath that the operator will well and truly operate it to record all matters and proceedings.

The court may then designate the person operating the equipment or any other competent person to read the recording and to transcribe it into typewriting. The person transcribing the recording shall subscribe to an oath that it has truly and correctly been transcribed.

The transcript may be used for all purposes for which transcripts are now received and accepted under existing statutes.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 95

; amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 45.